Washington statutes.
RCW 38.52.100

Appropriations—Acceptance of funds, services, etc.

(1) Each political subdivision shall have the power to make appropriations in the manner provided by law for making appropriations for the ordinary expenses of such political subdivision for the payment of expenses of its local organization for emergency management.

(2) Whenever the federal government or any agency or officer thereof shall offer to the state, or through the state to any political subdivision thereof, services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant, or loan, for purposes of emergency management, the state, acting through the governor, or such political subdivision, acting with the consent of the governor and through its executive head, may accept such offer and upon such acceptance the governor of the state or executive head of such political subdivision may authorize any officer of the state or of the political subdivision, as the case may be, to receive such services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the state or such political subdivision, and subject to the terms of the offer and the rules and regulations, if any, of the agency making the offer.

(3) Whenever any person, firm, or corporation shall offer to the state or to any political subdivision thereof, services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds by way of gift, grant, or loan, for the purposes of emergency management, the state, acting through the governor, or such political subdivision, acting through its executive head, may accept such offer and upon such acceptance the governor of the state or executive head of such political subdivision may authorize any officer of the state or of the political subdivision, as the case may be, to receive such services, equipment, supplies, materials, or funds on behalf of the state or such political subdivision, and subject to the terms of the offer.

[ 1984 c 38 s 10; 1974 ex.s. c 171 s 12; 1951 c 178 s 12.]